Colorado statutes. TITLE 43 Transportation
PART 4
LAW ENFORCEMENT ASSISTANCE FUND
FOR THE PREVENTION OF DRUNKEN DRIVING

43-4-401. Fund created.

The law enforcement assistance fund for the prevention of drunken driving and the enforcement of laws pertaining to driving under the influence of alcohol or drugs, referred to in this part 4 as the "fund", is hereby created in the office of the state treasurer.

Source:

L. 82:

Entire part added, p. 608, § 15, effective July 1.

43-4-402. Source of revenues - allocation of money - special account created.

The general assembly shall appropriate moneys annually to the fund in the general appropriation bill. In addition to any other penalty imposed pursuant to section 42-4-1307, C.R.S., every person who is convicted of, pleads guilty to, or receives a deferred sentence pursuant to section 18-1.3-102, C.R.S., for a violation of any of the offenses specified in section 42-4-1301 (1) or (2), C.R.S., shall be required to pay seventy-five dollars, which shall be deposited into the fund, and fifteen dollars, which shall be deposited into the county treasury of the county in which the conviction occurred.

The general assembly shall make an annual appropriation out of the money in the fund to the department of public health and environment in an amount sufficient to pay for the costs of evidential breath alcohol testing, including any education needs associated with testing, and implied consent specialists, the costs of which were previously paid out of the highway users tax fund. The general assembly shall also make an annual appropriation out of the money in the fund to the Colorado bureau of investigation to pay for the costs of toxicology laboratory services, including any education needs associated with the services. Of the money remaining in the fund, eighty percent shall be deposited in a special drunken driving account in the fund, which account is created, and be available immediately, without further appropriation, for allocation by the transportation commission to the office of transportation safety. The office of transportation safety shall allocate the money in accordance with the provisions of section 43-4-404 (1) and (2). The remaining twenty percent shall be appropriated by the general assembly to the behavioral health administration in the department of human services, which shall use the money for the purposes stated in section 43-4-404 (3). The office of transportation safety and the behavioral health administration in the department of human services may use amounts from the money allocated or appropriated to them by this subsection (2) as necessary for the purpose of paying the costs incurred by the office of transportation safety and the behavioral health administration in administering the programs established pursuant to this part 4; except that neither the office of transportation safety nor the behavioral health administration may use for the purposes of this part 4 an amount exceeding eight percent of the money allocated or appropriated.

Repealed.

and (4) Repealed.

Source:

L. 82:

Entire part added, p. 608, § 15, effective July 1.

L. 83:

Entire section amended, p. 1665, § 1, effective July 15.

L. 84:

(2) amended, p. 1124, § 41, effective June 7.

L. 86:

(1) amended, p. 1212, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 90:

(1) and (2) amended, p. 1829, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 91:

(2) amended, p. 1133, § 216, effective July 1.

L. 93:

(2) amended, p. 1126, § 48, effective July 1, 1994.

L. 94:

(1) amended, p. 2572, § 100, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 2000:

(2) amended, p. 262, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2003:

(2) amended, p. 459, § 23, effective March 5.

L. 2006:

(2)(b) repealed, p. 150, § 39, effective August 7.

L. 2007:

(1) amended, p. 2051, § 106, effective June 1.

L. 2010:

(3) added, (HB 10-1327), ch. 135, p. 451, § 11, effective April 15; (4) added, (HB 10-1388), ch. 362, p. 1717, § 5, effective June 7; (1) amended, (HB 10-1347), ch. 258, p. 1160, § 12, effective July 1.

L. 2011:

(2)(a) amended, (HB 11-1303), ch. 264, p. 1184, § 115, effective August 10.

L. 2013:

(2)(a) amended, (HB 13-1300), ch. 316, p. 1710, § 144, effective August 7.

L. 2014:

(2)(a) amended and (3) and (4) repealed, (HB 14-1340), ch. 124, p. 442, § 2, effective April 18.

L. 2017:

(2)(a) amended, (SB 17-242), ch. 263, p. 1261, § 26, effective May 25.

L. 2022:

(2)(a) amended, (HB 22-1278), ch. 222, p. 1581, § 207, effective July 1.

Cross references:

(1) For additional costs imposed on criminal actions and traffic offenses, see §§ 24-4.1-119 and 24-4.2-104; for additional costs levied on alcohol- and drug-related traffic offenses, see §§ 42-4-1301.4 (5) and 42-4-1307 (14); for disposition of fines and surcharges, see § 42-1-217.

(2) For the legislative declaration contained in the 1993 act amending subsection (2) of this section, see section 1 of chapter 230, Session Laws of Colorado 1993. For the legislative declaration in SB 17-242, see section 1 of chapter 263, Session Laws of Colorado 2017.

43-4-403. Drunken driving prevention and law enforcement program - minimum requirements.

Any municipality, city and county, or county which establishes a qualified program to coordinate efforts to prevent drunken driving and enforce the laws pertaining to alcohol- and drug-related traffic offenses shall be eligible to receive moneys from the fund. The minimum requirements for such a qualified program shall be established by rules and regulations promulgated by the office of transportation safety in the department of transportation, which rules and regulations shall provide for programs, including but not limited to, programs to educate the public regarding alcohol- and drug-related traffic offenses.

Source:

L. 82:

Entire part added, p. 609, § 15, effective July 1.

L. 91:

Entire section amended, p. 1133, § 217, effective July 1.

43-4-404. Formula for allocation of money - rules.

The office of transportation safety shall allocate not less than thirty percent and not more than fifty percent of the moneys allocated to the office pursuant to section 43-4-402 (2) to counties that have established a qualified drunken driving prevention and law enforcement program. The intent of the general assembly is that these moneys be expended in a manner that will improve enforcement of drunken driving laws. To this end, rules for the distribution of these moneys shall be developed by the office of transportation safety. All moneys appropriated hereunder shall be used for drunken driving prevention and law enforcement improvement by counties and not for statewide programs.

The office of transportation safety shall allocate not less than fifty percent and not more than seventy percent of the moneys to municipalities and city and counties that have established a qualified drunken driving prevention and law enforcement program. The intent of the general assembly is that these moneys be expended in a manner that will improve enforcement of drunken driving laws. To this end, rules for the distribution of these moneys shall be developed by the office of transportation safety. The office shall report annually to the transportation legislation review committee on the distribution and expenditure of these funds and the nature and purpose of the programs. All moneys appropriated hereunder shall be used for drunken driving prevention and law enforcement improvement by municipalities and city and counties and not for statewide programs.

The money in the fund appropriated to the behavioral health administration in the department of human services pursuant to section 43-4-402 (2) must be used to establish a statewide program for the prevention of driving after drinking, including educating the public in the problems of driving after drinking; training teachers, health professionals, and law enforcement in the dangers of driving after drinking; preparing and disseminating educational materials dealing with the effects of alcohol and other drugs on driving behavior; and preparing and disseminating education curriculum materials for use at all school levels. The behavioral health administration in the department of human services is authorized to contract with a public entity or a qualified private corporation to provide all or part of these services and to establish standards for the program.

Source:

L. 82:

Entire part added, p. 609, § 15, effective July 1.

L. 83:

(3) amended, p. 396, § 7, effective June 3; entire section amended, p. 1666, § 2, effective June 15.

L. 86:

(1) and (2) amended, p. 1212, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 91:

(1) and (2) amended, p. 1134, § 218, effective July 1.

L. 93:

(3) amended, p. 1126, § 49, effective July 1, 1994.

L. 2000:

(1) and (2) amended, p. 262, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 2002:

(1) and (2) amended, p. 873, § 13, effective August 7.

L. 2011:

(3) amended, (HB 11-1303), ch. 264, p. 1184, § 116, effective August 10.

L. 2017:

(3) amended, (SB 17-242), ch. 263, p. 1261, § 27, effective May 25; (1) amended, (SB 17-231), ch. 174, p. 634, § 4, effective August 9.

L. 2022:

(3) amended, (HB 22-1278), ch. 222, p. 1581, § 208, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

Amendments to this section by Senate Bill 83-215 and House Bill 83-1356 were harmonized.

Cross references:

(1) For the legislative declaration contained in the 1993 act amending subsection (3) of this section, see section 1 of chapter 230, Session Laws of Colorado 1993.

(2) For the legislative declaration in SB 17-242, see section 1 of chapter 263, Session Laws of Colorado 2017.